Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. INTENT.The intent of this chapter is to establish a statewide extended producer responsibility program for apparel and textile articles that emphasizes repair and reuse, and minimizes hazardous waste, greenhouse gases, environmental impacts, negative environmental justice impacts, and negative public health impacts.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. DEFINITIONS.The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1)(a) "Apparel" means clothing and accessory items intended for regular wear or formal occasions and indoor and outdoor activities.(b) "Apparel" includes, but is not limited to, undergarments, shirts, pants, skirts, dresses, overalls, bodysuits, costumes, vests, dancewear, suits, saris, scarves, tops, leggings, school uniforms, leisurewear, athletic wear, sports uniforms, swimwear, formal wear, onesies, bibs, footwear, handbags, backpacks, knitted and woven accessories, jackets, coats, snow pants, ski pants, uniforms, and workwear.(c) "Apparel" does not include the following:(i) Personal protective equipment worn to protect the wearer from health or environmental hazards;(ii) Personal protective equipment or clothing items for use by the United States military; or(iii) Disposable or reusable products designed to collect and absorb urine and feces, or disposable or reusable products regulated by the United States food and drug administration that are designed to collect and absorb menstruation or vaginal discharge.(2) "Authorized collector" means a person or entity that has entered into an agreement with a producer responsibility organization to collect covered products.(3) "Authorized sorter" means a person or entity that has entered into an agreement with a producer responsibility organization to sort covered products collected by authorized collectors.(4) "Brand" means a trademark, including both a registered trademark and an unregistered trademark, a logo, a name, a symbol, a word, an identifier, or a traceable mark that identifies a covered product and identifies the owner or licensee of the brand.(5) "Collection site" means a permanent or temporary location operated by an authorized collector at which covered products are collected and prepared for transport in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.(6) "Consumer" means an owner of a covered product, including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity, and includes the ultimate purchaser, owner, renter, or lessee of a covered product who is not, as to that covered product, the distributor, importer, producer, recycler, retailer, or producer responsibility organization.(7)(a) "Covered product" means an apparel or textile article introduced into the state.(b) "Covered product" does not include a secondhand or reused covered product.(8) "Department" means the department of ecology.(9) "Distributor" means a company that has a contractual relationship with one or more producers to market and sell covered products to a retailer.(10) "Government entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.208.020.(11) "Importer" means either:(a) A person qualifying as an importer of record for purposes of 19 U.S.C. Sec. 1484(a)(2)(B), as it existed as of January 1, 2025, with regard to the import of a covered product that is sold, distributed for sale, or offered for sale in or into the state that was manufactured or assembled by a company outside of the United States; or(b) A person importing into the state for sale, distributing for sale, or offering for sale in the state a covered product for use in the state that was manufactured or assembled by a company physically located outside of the state.(12) "Introduce" means to sell, rent, offer for sale, distribute, or ship a product within or into this state.(13) "Mail-back program" means a method of collecting covered products through a prepaid, preaddressed postage container that is transported by the United States postal service or a common carrier.(14) "Online marketplace" means a consumer-directed, electronically accessed platform for which all of the following are true:(a) The platform includes features that allow for, facilitate, or enable third-party sellers to engage in the sale, rental, purchase, payment, storage, shipping, or delivery of a covered product in this state;(b) The features described in (a) of this subsection are used by third-party sellers; and(c) The platform has a contractual relationship with consumers governing their use of the platform to purchase consumer products.(15)(a) "Producer" means:(i) A person who manufactures a covered product and owns or is the licensee of the brand or trademark under which that covered product is introduced in or into the state;(ii) If there is no person in Washington who is the producer for purposes of (a)(i) of this subsection, the producer of the covered product is the owner of a brand or trademark or, if the owner is not in the state, the exclusive licensee of a brand or trademark under which the covered product is sold, imported for sale, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in or into the state, regardless of whether the trademark is registered. For purposes of this subsection, an exclusive licensee is a person holding the exclusive right to use a trademark or brand in the state in connection with the manufacture, sale, or distribution for sale in or into the state of the covered product;(iii) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, then the producer of the covered product is the person that imports the covered product into the state for sale or distribution;(iv) If there is no other person in the state who is the producer for purposes of (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the producer of the covered product is the distributor, retailer, or wholesaler who introduces the product in or into the state; or(v) A person is the producer of a covered material introduced in or into this state, as defined in (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection, except where another person has mutually signed an agreement with a producer as defined in (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection that contractually assigns responsibility to the person as the producer, and the person has joined a registered producer responsibility organization as the responsible producer for that covered material under this chapter. If another person is assigned responsibility as the producer under this subsection, the producer under (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection must provide written certification of that contractual agreement to the producer responsibility organization;(b) For purposes of this chapter, the sale of a covered product must be deemed to occur in the state if the covered product is delivered to the customer in the state;(c) "Producer" does not include:(i) A seller that sells only secondhand covered products;(ii)(A) A seller with less than $1,000,000 in annual aggregate global turnover as annually adjusted for inflation. The department must use the consumer price index for urban wage earners to calculate the annual rate of inflation adjustment effective January 1st of each year.(B) The aggregate global turnover of a producer must be calculated by adding together the respective turnovers of all of the following:(I) The producer concerned;(II) Those entities in which the producer is concerned directly or indirectly, through ownership of more than one-half of the capital or business assets, through the power to exercise more than one-half of the voting rights, through the power to appoint more than one-half of the members of the supervisory board, the administrative board, or bodies legally representing the undertakings, or through the right to manage the entities' affairs;(III) Those entities that have the rights or powers identified in (c)(ii)(B)(II) of this subsection;(IV) Those entities in which an entity referred to in (c)(ii)(B)(III) of this subsection has the rights or powers listed in (c)(ii)(B)(II) of this subsection; or(V) Those entities in which two or more entities referred to in (c)(ii)(B)(I) through (IV) of this subsection jointly have the rights or powers listed in (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection.(16) "Producer responsibility organization" means:(a) A nonprofit organization that qualifies for a tax exemption under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code and is designated by a producer or group of producers to fulfill the requirements of this chapter; or(b) A producer that registers with the department as a producer responsibility organization and implements an individual plan addressing the covered products of the producer.(17) "Repair" means any alteration or improvement of damaged covered product including, but not limited to:(a) Redesigning and repurposing;(b) Mending rips, holes, seams, or hems or other tailoring;(c) Removing and repairing surface damage, such as pilling, stain removal, or abrasion;(d) Securing and reattaching buttons and other fastenings;(e) Dyeing, redyeing, overdyeing, or printing of images on covered products; or(f) Preparation for reuse, rental, and resale.(18) "Responsible market" means an entity that:(a) Prepares for reuse, resale, rental or repurpose, or first produces and sells, transfers, or uses recycled, reused, or repaired product or recycled content feedstock that meets the quality standards necessary to be used in the creation of new or reconstituted products;(b) Complies with all applicable federal, state, and local statutes, rules, ordinances, and other laws governing environmental, health, safety, and financial responsibility;(c) If the market operates in the state, manages waste according to the state's solid waste management hierarchy established in RCW 70A.205.005(8); and(d) Meets the minimum operational standards adopted under a producer responsibility organization plan to protect the environment, public health, worker health and safety, and minimize adverse impacts to socially vulnerable populations.(19) "Responsible producer" means a producer that is not excluded under subsection (15)(c) of this section.(20) "Retailer" means a person who introduces a covered product in or into the state to a person through any means including, but not limited to, sales or rental outlets, catalogs, the telephone, the internet, or any electronic means.(21) "Reuse" means the resale or rental of a covered product to a consumer for its original intended use with or without repair.(22) "Secondhand covered product" means any covered product that has previously been owned.(23) "Secondhand markets" means a retailer who sells or rents secondhand covered products including, but not limited to, thrift stores, collection site operators, online resale platforms, consignment shops, and flea markets.(24) "Socially vulnerable population" includes:(a) Any person residing in:(i) A census tract that contains a high overall social vulnerability index as measured using the United States centers for disease control and prevention's and the agency for toxic substances and disease registry's social vulnerability index, as it existed as of January 1, 2025, for the most recent year such data are available; or(ii) As applicable, an alternative population specified consistent with RCW 70A.208.270; or(b) Any person who has an income below the minimum necessary for a household based on family composition in a given geography to adequately meet their basic needs without public or private assistance, as measured by the University of Washington's center for women's welfare, for the most recent year such data are available.(25)(a) "Textile" or "textile article" means an item customarily used in households or businesses that are made entirely or primarily from a natural, artificial, or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric. For purposes of this chapter, "textile article" includes, but is not limited to, blankets, curtains, fabric window coverings, accessories, towels, tapestries, bedding, tablecloths, napkins, linens, signage, and pillows.(b) "Textile article" does not include single-use products including paper towels, paper napkins, toilet paper, facial tissue, or wet or dry wipes.(26) "Third-party seller" means a person or entity, independent of an online marketplace, who sells or rents, offers to sell or rent, or contracts with an online marketplace to sell or rent a consumer product in the state by or through an online marketplace.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION REGISTRATION.(1)(a) By January 31, 2027, each producer of a covered product must appoint a producer responsibility organization or producer responsibility organizations to address its covered products.(b) By March 1, 2027, each producer responsibility organization must register with the department on behalf of its producers.(c) The registration of a producer responsibility organization must describe how the producer responsibility organization meets the registration requirements of this section. If registration applications for more than one producer responsibility organization, other than individual producers registering as producer responsibility organizations, are submitted to the department, the department must determine and register the proposed producer responsibility organization that can most effectively implement this chapter. The department may not allow registration of more than one producer responsibility organization, other than an individual producer registered as a producer responsibility organization, for purposes of the first five-year plan implementation period.(2) The department must, by March 31, 2027, approve a producer responsibility organization that meets the requirements of this chapter and:(a) The producer responsibility organization has a governing board consisting of producers that are diverse in size and type and that represent the diversity of covered products placed in the market by those entities. The governing board must include ex officio members involved in the collection, sorting, repair, reuse, recycling, or management of covered products; and(b) The producer responsibility organization demonstrates that it has adequate financial responsibility and financial controls in place, including fraud prevention measures and an audit schedule, to ensure proper management of funds.(3) After January 31, 2036, the department may determine that an additional producer responsibility organization would be beneficial in satisfying the requirements of this chapter, and may approve the registration of additional producer responsibility organizations that meet the requirements of this chapter and that:(a) Submits to the department, and agrees to cover the department's reasonable costs to review, a petition to establish a new producer responsibility organization;(b) Is composed of a sufficient number of producers to jointly comply with the requirements of this chapter; and(c) The proposed producer responsibility organization covers the costs of all of the provisions of this chapter applicable to the proposed producer responsibility organization and its participant producers.(4) The requirements of subsections (2)(a) and (b) and (3)(a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply to individual producers registering with the department as a producer responsibility organization. The department may require an individual producer registering with the department as a producer responsibility organization to pay incremental costs to the department under this chapter associated with the registration of the individual producer as a producer responsibility organization.(5) Each producer covered under a producer responsibility organization must register with that producer responsibility organization in accordance with the procedures and requirements established by that producer responsibility organization and must comply with those procedures and requirements.(6) Upon the approval of a plan under this chapter or by July 1, 2031, whichever is sooner, a producer is subject to penalties under this chapter unless:(a) The producer is a participant of a producer responsibility organization whose registration has been approved by the department or the producer has received registration approval from the department as a producer responsibility organization; and(b)(i) For producers that have joined a producer responsibility organization, all covered products are accounted for in the plan; or(ii) For producers that are registered as a producer responsibility organization, all covered products of the producer are accounted for in the plan; and(c) If an entity does not meet the definition of a producer and is not subject to this chapter before January 1, 2031, but at any point, after January 1, 2031, meets the definition of a producer, the producer must, within 90 days, become a participant of the producer responsibility organization or register with the department as a producer responsibility organization, and comply with the requirements of this chapter.(7) A producer is not in compliance with this chapter and is subject to penalties under section 15 of this act if a covered product sold or offered for sale by the producer is not subject to an approved producer responsibility organization plan.(8)(a) Beginning March 1, 2028, and every March 1st thereafter until annual reporting, each producer or the producer responsibility organization must provide the department, in a form and manner established by the department, a list of brands of covered products that each producer sells, distributes for sale, imports for sale, or offers for sale in or into the state.(b) A producer or producer responsibility organization must update the list described in (a) of this subsection and provide the updated list to the department on or before January 15th of each year, or upon request of the department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION RESPONSIBILITIES.(1) Each producer responsibility organization whose registration has been approved by the department under section 3 of this act must, individually or collaboratively, prepare and cover the costs of the needs assessments described in section 5 of this act.(2) Each producer responsibility organization must manage collection sites consistent with section 9 of this act.(3) Each participant of a producer responsibility organization with an approved plan must comply with the requirements of this chapter. The producer responsibility organization must notify the department within 30 calendar days of any of the following:(a) The end of any three-month period in which the producer responsibility organization unsuccessfully attempted to obtain a fee, records, or other information from a participant producer, or received incomplete or incorrect records or information;(b) The date a producer no longer participates in a producer responsibility organization's plan; or(c) Any instance of noncompliance by a producer.(4)(a) Producers and a producer responsibility organization, acting on behalf of producers that prepare, submit, and implement a plan pursuant to this chapter and who are thereby subject to regulation by the department, are hereby granted immunity from state laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade and commerce, for the limited purpose of planning, reporting, and operating the extended producer responsibility organization program, including:(i) The creation, implementation, or management of the producer responsibility organization and any plan regardless of whether it is submitted, denied, or approved;(ii) The cost and structure of a plan; and(iii) The types or quantities of covered products being managed pursuant to this chapter.(b) The immunity granted in (a) of this subsection does not apply to:(i) Fixing a price of or for covered products, except for an agreement related to costs or charges associated with participation in a plan approved by the department;(ii) Fixing the output or production of covered products; or(iii) Restricting the geographic area in which, or customers to whom, covered products will be sold or rented.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. NEEDS ASSESSMENT.(1)(a) Each statewide needs assessment carried out by a producer responsibility organization must be designed to determine the necessary steps and investment needed for covered products to achieve the requirements of this chapter.(b) An initial needs assessment for covered products must be completed prior to the completion and approval of a plan for covered products under this chapter. The initial needs assessment must be submitted to the department by March 1, 2028. The department must review and approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove the needs assessment as meeting the requirements of this section within 90 days of submission.(c) Needs assessments must be updated, in whole or in part, at least every five years, and as necessary to ensure the requirements of this chapter are met. For each needs assessment completed after the initial needs assessment submitted to the department by March 1, 2028, the producer responsibility organization must conduct:(i) A survey of public awareness of the program created under this chapter, and its convenience;(ii) An equity study that analyzes, at minimum, information about:(A) Working conditions, wage and benefit levels, workforce development efforts, and employment levels of minorities and women employed by service providers or responsible markets under this chapter;(B) The degree to which programs to increase access, convenience, and education are successful in raising reuse, recycling, repair, repurposing, and upcycling rates in areas where participation in these activities is low. This must include an evaluation of the efficacy of activities that are conceptually, linguistically, and culturally tailored to effectively reach diverse residents, and which such activities could be adjusted or improved to achieve improved outcomes for specific areas or sectors where participation is low; and(C) Strategies to increase participation in reuse, repair, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling of covered products; and(iii) A process to receive input from government entities, community organizations, and Washington residents regarding the program's accessibility and performance.(d) A producer responsibility organization may select an independent third-party contractor to complete the needs assessment.(e) A producer responsibility organization may prepare more than one needs assessment, with each assessment specific to one or more covered products under this chapter, or may prepare one comprehensive needs assessment that includes all covered products under this chapter.(2) Each needs assessment must comply with all of the following:(a) Be designed to inform the program budget and plan; and(b) Include an evaluation of all of the following with respect to covered products and covered product categories:(i) Existing scope and scale of annual covered products diverted to landfill or incineration in the state by type of covered product, material composition, and volume and annual covered product recovery diverted to reuse, repair, or recycling in the state or from the state by type of covered product, material composition, and volume;(ii) The current repair, reuse, recycling, collection, sorting, and hauling system in the state and the expanded access and additional repair, reuse, recycling, collection, sorting, disassembly, and hauling options needed to meet the requirements of this chapter;(iii) Current market conditions, including rates of textile and apparel export, and the need to create responsible and economically viable end markets in the state, regionally, and globally;(iv) Existing state statutory provisions and funding sources related to market development and financial incentives to help achieve the state's goals related to repair, reuse, recycling, collection, sorting, disassembly, and hauling;(v) Consumer education needs and the methods by which the producer responsibility organization can best reach customers with educational messaging and assess the effectiveness of that messaging;(vi) Consumer behaviors to drive repair, reuse, and recycling and to achieve the requirements of this chapter;(vii) Funding needs and incentive mechanisms necessary to achieve the requirements of this chapter, including coverage of the operation of the extended producer responsibility organization program;(viii) Fee reduction or redistribution mechanism necessary to achieve the requirements of this chapter, in a manner that equitably distributes the costs among participating producers that reflects production and sales and rental volumes relevant to the Washington market. Fee reduction or redistribution mechanisms may consider existing producer collection, repair, reuse, repurposing, and recycling programs that help achieve the purpose of this chapter;(ix) Actions and investments necessary to provide equitable and sufficient access to collection, repurposing, recycling, composting, processing, and transportation to responsible and economically viable end markets;(x) An assessment of the availability of existing organizations that repair, repurpose, and upcycle covered products;(xi) An evaluation of the availability or lack of availability of responsible markets for repaired, reused, and recycled covered products, the need to incentivize reused, repurposed, repaired, and upcycled products or recycled material market development, and the associated investments or actions needed to ensure that the covered products are reused, repaired, repurposed, upcycled, or recycled and have responsible and economically viable and sufficient end markets;(xii) An evaluation of the factors contributing to the presence of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances and other chemicals identified or regulated under chapters 70A.350 and 70A.430 RCW, and the actions and investments needed to avoid contamination related to recycling. This must include available end markets for recycled material that cannot be remanufactured into apparel or textile articles in Washington; and(xiii) An evaluation of what factors will be important to successfully implement the eco-modulated fee structure required by section 10 of this act, and what associated data collection will be necessary as part of the plan.(3) The department must support and provide technical input on the development of each needs assessment. A producer responsibility organization must develop each needs assessment in consultation with a broad diversity of government entities collection, brokering, reuse, repair, and recycling service providers, and processors that reflect the different needs and challenges presented by managing different covered products through final disposition.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. PLAN CONTENTS.(1) Plans must be submitted, reviewed, and approved consistent with section 7 of this act.(2) Plans for covered products must be designed to result in the acceptance and management of all postconsumer covered products and must include all of the following:(a) The names and contact information, including email address, phone number, and mailing and physical addresses, of producers and brands of covered products under the plan;(b) A description of the method to establish and administer a means for fully funding the producer responsibility organization, consistent with section 10 of this act, including a proposed five-year budget;(c) Quantifiable five-year and annual performance standards and metrics unless or until the department publishes performance standards under section 8 of this act. The producer responsibility organization must amend its plan to meet or exceed the performance standards published by the department. Performance targets established in a plan after the initial plan implementation period must demonstrate and achieve kaizen and other forms of continuous improvement relative to performance targets for preceding plan implementation periods;(d) A description of how the producer responsibility organization will provide for a free, equitable, and convenient drop-off or collection system for covered products consistent with section 9 of this act;(e) A description of how the collection sites will be authorized and managed, including:(i) How government entities can request to be a collection site under section 9 of this act;(ii) How the producer responsibility organization will provide to collection sites at no cost the appropriate containers for covered products, training, signage, safety guidance, and educational materials;(iii) The process by which the producer responsibility organization will provide, at no cost, for the transport of covered products from collection sites to an authorized sorter or directly to an authorized repair, reuse, repurposing, upcycling, or resale organization, or recycling facility;(iv) How collection sites will be facilitated to divert covered products to secondhand markets for reuse, and to implement other best practices for management of covered products consistent with the waste management hierarchy established in RCW 70A.205.005(8);(v) A list of all proposed criteria, rules, conditions, and requirements for authorized collectors, authorized sorters, and authorized repair businesses, including a template proposed agreement for each of those types of entities, as applicable;(vi) How the producer responsibility organization will prioritize the use of secondhand markets of covered products, when establishing collection sites to meet the minimum requirements in section 9(2) of this act; and(vii) How collection sites will be instructed to identify and reject counterfeit products that are not covered products under this chapter;(f) A description of how covered products will be sorted, transported, processed, repaired, repurposed, upcycled, reused, and recycled following collection at collection sites, consistent with section 9 of this act;(g) A description of how the producer responsibility organization will ensure that the program tracks and manages covered materials collected through the program in a manner consistent with standards that safeguard against the dumping of covered products abroad, which may include, but are not limited to, corporate social responsibility (CSR), SAI social accountability international (SA8000), worldwide responsible accredited production (WRAP), SCS global services-certified responsible source textiles;(h) A description of the comprehensive statewide education and outreach program designed to educate consumers and promote participation in the program offered by the producer responsibility organization, consistent with section 11 of this act. This description must include a description of the strategies, goals, and metrics the producer responsibility organization will use to annually assess and evaluate the efficacy of the comprehensive statewide education and outreach program required by section 11 of this act, and a description of how the producer responsibility organization will address any deficits in the program identified during the annual assessment and evaluation;(i) A description of how the producer responsibility organization will coordinate with other producer responsibility organizations registered under this chapter to avoid confusion to the public regarding program activities including, but not limited to, education and outreach, including establishing point-of-sale messaging, a joint website, and toll-free telephone number for purposes of providing information on the program;(j) Coordination with and compensation for, and description of the efforts and methods used to coordinate activities with and compensate for, entities who are responsive to a request from the producer responsibility organization, including other producer responsibility organizations, collection, repair, repurposing, upcycling, reuse, and recycling programs, and community-based organizations, including nonprofit retail establishments that sell reused, repurposed, upcycled, and repaired covered products, and that contact the producer responsibility organization and meet the criteria to run or support collection events;(k) A description of how the plan will address the presence of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances and other chemicals identified or regulated under chapters 70A.350 and 70A.430 RCW, including but not limited to the actions and investments needed to avoid contamination in the recycling or upcycling process and available end markets for recycled material that cannot be remanufactured into apparel or textile articles in Washington;(l) A description of how the producer responsibility organization will minimize the negative environmental and human health impacts and maximize the positive environmental and human health impacts of all operations associated with the plan, including impacts from collected covered products exported outside of Washington;(m) A process by which the financial activities of the producer responsibility organization or individual producers that are related to implementation of the plan will be subject to an independent audit consistent with generally accepted accounting principles; and(n) A description of the feedback received by the producer responsibility organization from the advisory council established in section 18 of this act in the development of the draft or updated plan, and an explanation of how and why the producer responsibility organization did or did not incorporate each item of feedback into its plan.(3) Under the plan, a producer responsibility organization must:(a) Develop a program to support laundries for laundering covered products that includes funding for technology that reduces water consumption and reduces microfiber and microplastic discharges in wastewater; and(b) Develop strategies to address preconsumer and postconsumer design challenges for covered products including, but not limited to, compostability, recyclability, reusability, repairability, reduction and removal of harmful chemicals, microfiber and microplastic shedding, and mixed material blends.(4)(a) The plan submitted under this section must be accompanied by a contingency plan demonstrating how the activities in the plan will continue to be carried out by some other entity, if needed, such as a trustee:(i) Until such time as a new plan is submitted and approved by the department;(ii) Upon the expiration of an approved plan;(iii) If the producer responsibility organization notifies the department that it will cease to implement an approved plan; or(iv) In any other event that the producer responsibility organization can no longer carry out plan implementation.(b) The contingency plan must guarantee that the contracts, financial data, and other necessary authority and assets to operate the program will vest in a trustee or other entity approved by the department. The trustee must operate the most recently approved plan, subject to the direction of the department, until such time as a new plan is approved. Upon plan expiration or revocation of the plan, the balance of the producer responsibility organization's operating reserves must be transferred to the control of the trustee within five calendar days. All documents, digital records, contracts, and files related to the operation of the plan must be transferred to the control of the trustee within five calendar days.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. PLAN DEVELOPMENT, SUBMISSION, AND APPROVAL PROCESS.(1)(a) By July 1, 2030, or no later than six months after the adoption of rules by the department to implement this chapter, whichever comes later, a producer responsibility organization must develop and submit to the department a complete plan, in a form and manner determined by the department, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, for the collection, transportation, repair, sorting, upcycling, reuse, repurposing, recycling, and the safe and proper management of covered products.(b) The department must post each submitted plan on the department's website and allow advisory council established in section 18 of this act and public comment for no less than 45 days before approving, denying, or requesting additional information on the submitted plan.(c)(i) The department must review each submitted plan for compliance with this chapter and must approve, disapprove, or conditionally approve the plan within 120 days of receipt.(ii) If the department disapproves of a plan submitted by a producer responsibility organization, the department must explain how the plan does not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the producer responsibility organization within 60 days of disapproval. The producer responsibility organization may resubmit to the department a revised plan within 30 days of the date the written notice was issued.(iii) The department must review and approve or disapprove the revised draft plan or amendment no later than 60 days after the department receives it. If the department disapproves the revised plan or revised plan amendment, the department shall provide the reason, in writing, and either: (A) Direct changes to the revised plan or plan amendment; or (B) require the producer responsibility organization to submit a second revision no later than 60 days from the date of the rejection.(iv) The department may approve the second revision submitted by the producer responsibility organization with additional conditions the producer responsibility organization must implement.(2) A producer responsibility organization comprised of more than one member producer may not limit its plan for covered products to the covered products of any producer or producers participating in that plan.(3)(a) By July 1, 2031, or within six months of plan approval, whichever is later, each producer responsibility organization must implement the plan approved by the department.(b) A producer responsibility organization with an approved plan must submit any proposed substantial change to the plan, as determined by the department, to the department for approval following the process in subsection (1) of this section.(4)(a) A producer responsibility organization must revise and update its plan at least every five years after it is approved by the department.(b) The producer responsibility organization must submit to the department a revised plan for review and approval consistent with subsections (1) through (3) of this section. The producer responsibility organization must submit the revised plan to the department under this subsection at least 12 months prior to the review deadline identified in (a) of this subsection. The revised plan must include a cover letter that summarizes revisions to the plan within 90 days of the review deadline outlined under this subsection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. PERFORMANCE TARGETS.(1)(a) Each producer of covered products and each producer responsibility organization must achieve the quantifiable five-year and annual performance standards and metrics performance standards established in its plan.(b) After March 1, 2033, each producer of covered products and each producer responsibility organization must achieve the performance standards adopted by the department under subsection (2) of this section.(2) After March 1, 2035, based on information included in plans and annual reports, other information provided by producer responsibility organizations, department waste characterization studies, needs assessments, and economic and any other relevant information, as determined by the department, the department must submit recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature whether and how to:(a) Establish statutory performance standards and the dates by which they are required to be achieved; and(b) Adjust requirements around collection site participation, in order to ensure the performance standards are achieved.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. COLLECTION SITES.(1)(a) A producer responsibility organization must approve collection sites under its program that agree to comply with all applicable state, federal, or municipal laws, regulations, and rules and conditions adopted by the producer responsibility organization. A producer responsibility organization must reimburse government entities that serve as collection sites for demonstrable costs, as defined by rules adopted by the department, associated with service as a collection site including, but not limited to, associated labor costs and other costs associated with accessibility and collection site standards such as storage.(b) A producer responsibility organization must include as a collection site under its program any government entity that offers in writing to participate in the program and agrees to comply with any producer responsibility organization criteria that are consistent with its approved plan, even if the minimum thresholds described in subsection (2) of this section have been achieved. A producer responsibility organization must include the government entity as a collection site in the program within 90 days of receiving the written offer to participate. The producer responsibility organization is not required to respond to offers to participate until a plan has been approved by the department.(c) A producer responsibility organization may suspend or terminate a collection site that does not comply with all applicable state, federal, or municipal laws and regulations or adhere to the rules, criteria, and conditions imposed by the producer responsibility organization.(d) A collection site must be operated and managed to ensure that covered products are collected safely and handled in accordance with all applicable state, federal, and municipal laws and regulations and the rules and conditions of the plan. A producer responsibility organization must allow authorized collectors and authorized sorters to divert reusable covered products for sale in secondhand markets, repurpose, reuse, repair, or upcycling in a manner consistent with standards established by the producer responsibility organization in an approved plan.(2) A producer responsibility organization must provide for a free, equitable, and convenient drop-off or collection system for covered products that may include temporary collection sites and mail-back options, and that the collection standards must include permanent collection sites in each county that:(a) Provides for a minimum of 10 permanent collection sites or one permanent collection site per 25,000 people, whichever is greater, except that:(i) A county with a population of 18,000 and under, as reported annually by the office of financial management, must have a minimum of three collection locations;(ii) A county with a population of between 18,001 and 50,000, inclusive, as reported annually by the office of financial management, must have a minimum of four collection locations; and(iii) A county with a population of between 50,001 and 100,000, inclusive, as reported annually by the office of financial management, must have a minimum of eight collection locations;(b) Provides for a reasonable and equitable geographic spread of permanent collection sites, as justified by a description in the plan.(3) Following collection at a collection site, covered products must:(a) Be handled and managed consistent with the waste management hierarchy established in RCW 70A.205.005(8), including prioritization of reuse, including repair, repurpose, upcycling, and recycling, in descending order of priority, of collected covered products;(b) Include incentive payments, grants, and market development investments, including nonprofit retail resellers of covered products, to encourage reuse over recycling and other methods and to support the infrastructure necessary to implement the plan, which must include incentive payments, grants, and market development investments that prioritize infrastructure closer to the point of generation under (e) of this subsection and ensure that covered products are repaired, reused, repurposed, upcycled, or recycled and have responsible end markets;(c) Be sorted by authorized sorters and the flow of covered products to and from authorized collectors, authorized sorters, authorized repair businesses, and recyclers must be tracked through final disposition;(d) Be managed by the producer responsibility organization to maximize the reuse, repair, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling of all covered products, and to minimize disposal of covered products collected by the producer responsibility organization; and(e) Be managed by the producer responsibility organization in a manner that prioritizes, to the extent feasible, the use and development of sorting, repair, and recycling facilities located closer to the point of collection to minimize transportation-related emissions and increase accountability for the ultimate disposition of covered products.(4) The producer responsibility organization must conduct an annual assessment, using metrics described in its plan, to determine how collection, sorting, and transportation outcomes aligned with projections.(5) Products designed by use for infants and children under 12 years of age with components that pose a risk of detachment, thus creating choking hazards, or containing components subject to 16 C.F.R. Parts 1303 and 1307, including, but not limited to, metallic, vinyl, or plastic snaps, zippers, grommets, closures, or appliques, may be excluded from the reuse and repair under subsection (3)(a) of this section by a producer responsibility organization.(6) Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the utilities and transportation commission to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of residential recyclable materials, in accordance with chapter 81.77 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION FEES AND REIMBURSEMENT OF STATE COSTS.(1) Each producer responsibility organization must pay all administrative and operational costs associated with establishing and implementing the program including, but not limited to, the cost of collection, transportation, sorting, repairing, reuse, repurposing, upcycling, recycling, and the safe and proper management of covered products.(2)(a) A producer responsibility organization must establish a method for fully funding the producer responsibility organization in a manner that equitably distributes the program's costs among participating producers. Upon plan approval, the funding mechanism approved in the plan must include a per-unit eco-modulated fee that reflects Washington sales volume, existing producer collection, repair, reuse, and recycling programs that help achieve the purposes of this chapter, and the cost of reusing, repairing, repurposing, upcycling, recycling, or otherwise managing covered products under this chapter. The intent of the eco-modulated fee is to incentivize design choices that facilitate the achievement of goals outlined in the plan, including reuse, repair, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling, and reduction and removal of harmful chemicals, microfiber and microplastic shedding, and mixed material blends through reduced fees, while using malus fees to disincentivize practices and materials incongruent with the plan goals. The producer responsibility organization must consider existing collection, repair, reuse, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling programs in developing the eco-modulated fee structure.(b) The funding mechanism must demonstrate adequate funding for all administrative and operational costs of the program, to be borne by participating producers, and must distribute participating producers' costs in consideration of the cost of managing their specific covered products under the approved plan.(3)(a) A producer responsibility organization must propose in each plan a five-year budget that establishes a funding level sufficient to operate the producer responsibility organization in a prudent and responsible manner. The budget must demonstrate how estimated revenues will cover all budgeted costs for each cost category, and the plan must describe the types of activities related to each line item cost category.(b) Budgeted costs categories must include, but are not limited to:(i) Administrative costs, which include the department's costs to implement and enforce this chapter. Each producer responsibility organization must submit an initial payment to the department by June 30, 2027, to cover actual and estimated costs of the department from the effective date of this section through June 30, 2028. Beginning June 30, 2028, each producer responsibility organization must submit an annual registration fee to the department to fund estimated costs of the department to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter for the coming fiscal year;(ii) Education and outreach costs;(iii) Operational costs;(iv) Capital costs; and(v) A reserve to operate the producer responsibility organization should there be unexpected events, such as losses of income, and large unbudgeted expenses in order to protect the collection, sorting, reuse, repurposing, repair, upcycling, and recycling infrastructure the producer responsibility organization relies upon in its plan, during any lapse in a producer participating during the life of the program. This cost category must include a reserve level amount that is justified by a description in the plan. The producer responsibility organization must maintain reserve funds sufficient to operate the plan for no less than six months. Each new plan submitted by a producer responsibility organization must establish its reserve and maintain the required reserve fund balance by the end of the second year of plan operation.(4) Retailers, producers, or producer responsibility organizations may not charge a point-of-sale fee to consumers to cover the costs of the producer responsibility organization or the program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. EDUCATION AND OUTREACH.(1) A producer responsibility organization must develop and implement a comprehensive statewide education and outreach program that, at minimum, includes:(a) An education and communications strategy to effectively promote participation in the program and provide the information necessary for effective participation by consumers, retailers, distributors, wholesalers, government entities, nonprofit organizations, and others;(b) A joint internet website, in coordination with all other producer responsibility organizations registered under this chapter with the department, that publicizes the location of collection sites and provides information to consumers on how to drop off covered products at the free and convenient network of collection sites offered by the producer responsibility organization, including any information reasonably necessary to safely and conveniently access the collection, repair, and recycling services offered by the producer responsibility organization;(c) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible;(d) Signage and materials that are required by the producer responsibility organization for collection sites, and a method for collection sites to access replacement materials at no cost to the collection site;(e) Education and outreach activities that are conceptually, linguistically, and culturally tailored to effectively reach diverse residents and include culturally responsive materials and methods that rely on evidence-based practices, are accessible, clear, and support the achievement of the performance targets, including by developing and providing educational materials, resources, and campaigns that encourage and support reuse, repair, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling behaviors by residents and visitors;(f) Promotional materials and activities, or both, that explain the purpose of the producer responsibility organization and the means by which the program is being carried out;(g) A strategy to encourage consumers to separate products that are not covered products from covered products, when appropriate, before submitting the covered products to an authorized collection site or mail-back program;(h) Materials designed to inform third-party sellers or renters on online platforms of their duty to comply with this chapter and how to join the producer responsibility organization; and(i) Information for the public on secondhand markets and the benefits of reuse, repair, repurpose, and upcycling.(2) The statewide education and outreach program must:(a) Promote the safe and proper management of covered products, including information on where customers can purchase repaired, repurposed, upcycled, recycled, and reused covered products. This must include education and training for authorized collectors to incentivize domestic resale of usable covered products;(b) Not promote the disposal of covered products in a manner inconsistent with the services offered by the plan; and(c) Include information for consumers about how to avoid improper disposal of covered products.(3) A producer responsibility organization must coordinate with authorized collectors and authorized sorters and participating government entities in carrying out education and outreach under this section.(4) Activities undertaken under this section must:(a) Assist producers in improving product labels as a means of informing consumers about reuse, repair, repurposing, upcycling, recycling, and other environmentally sound methods of managing covered products;(b) Increase public awareness of how to use and manage covered products in an environmentally sound manner and how to access reuse, repurposing, repair, upcycling, and recycling services;(c) Encourage behavior change to increase participation in waste reduction, reuse, repair, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling programs including by considering motivational structures for recycling and reuse by engaging local communities in the design and implementation of programs and developing community-led solutions that are tailored to their specific cultural practices and waste generation patterns; and(d) Develop and provide education and outreach materials that are able to be used by retail establishments, collectors, government entities, service providers, schools, institutions, youth organizations, and nonprofit organizations. Outreach materials must be accessible in multiple languages and culturally appropriate formats including by reaching non-English-speaking communities and by using a variety of tailored media and behavior change strategies.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. RECORDKEEPING AND REPORTING.(1)(a) A producer responsibility organization must keep board minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect the activities and transactions of the producer responsibility organization.(b) A producer responsibility organization must include in its plan a process by which the financial activities of the organization or individual producers that are related to implementation of the plan will be subject to an independent audit consistent with generally accepted accounting principles.(c) The failure of a producer responsibility organization or producer, or their respective agent who holds records, to produce documents or data requested by the department, required to be collected or generated to carry out operation of the plan in the form and manner determined by the department, as part of a department audit, or review of a third-party audit, constitutes a violation of this chapter.(d) A producer responsibility organization must retain an independent public accountant, certified in the United States, to annually audit the accounting books of the producer responsibility organization. The department must review the independent certified public accountant audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the producer responsibility organization's plan and annual report. After the department conducts a review of the independent third party's annual audit, the department must notify the producer responsibility organization of any conduct or practice that does not comply with this chapter or of any inconsistencies identified in the audit. The items submitted to the department as part of the independent audit must include:(i) Financial statements audited in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;(ii) An audit of the producer responsibility organization's compliance with this chapter; and(iii) An audit of the producer responsibility organization's adherence to, execution of, and consistency with its plan.(2) A producer responsibility organization must annually submit to the department, in the form and manner and by the date determined by the department, an annual report and make that report publicly available on the producer responsibility organization's website. The report must include, at minimum, all of the following information for the preceding calendar year unless otherwise specified:(a) The independent audit required under subsection (1)(d) of this section;(b) The producer responsibility organization's costs, according to the cost categories established in the plan, and revenues;(c) A summary of any anticipated changes to allocations in cost categories for the next calendar year;(d) Any changes to the distribution of a participating producer's costs;(e) The amounts of the eco-modulated fees based on the criteria established under section 10(2) of this act and the producer responsibility organization's evaluation of the effectiveness of the eco-modulated fees;(f) An updated list of producers participating in the plan and an updated list of the names and contact information, including email address, telephone number, and physical and mailing addresses of each producer and brands of covered products covered under the plan;(g) A list of the producer responsibility organization's authorized collection sites by name, location, and type;(h)(i) The amount of covered products sold in or into the state by the producers covered by the producer responsibility organization's plan;(ii) The amount described in (h)(i) of this subsection must be broken down by material and fiber type category and harmonized tariff schedule of the United States (HTS) number;(i) The total weight of covered products, respectively, that were collected, broken down by material and fiber type categories;(j) The total weight of covered products, by category, that were collected and deemed reusable or recyclable by each respective authorized collector and authorized sorter;(k) A list of each authorized sorter, authorized repair, repurpose, or upcycling business, and covered product recycling facility used by the producer responsibility organization, including name and location and the total weight of covered products handled by each location;(l) The total weight and number of introduced covered products attributed to a producer, who is a registered participant of the producer responsibility organization's plan, which are collected in the state and reused, repurposed, upcycled, or recycled by the producer responsibility organization, including a description of the methodology and information used to determine and calculate these values;(m) A complete accounting of the ultimate disposition of all covered products collected by the producer responsibility organization, including the total weight of covered products that were repaired, repurposed, upcycled, or recycled;(n) Metrics and a description of the progress towards attaining the performance standards included in the plan;(o) A description of the methods used to collect, transport, repair, repurpose, upcycle, and recycle covered products by the producer responsibility organization, including a description of:(i) How the producer responsibility organization handled and managed covered products according to the waste hierarchy in RCW 70A.205.005(8);(ii) How the producer responsibility organization maximized reuse, repurpose, upcycling, and recycling of all covered products;(iii) How the producer responsibility organization minimized disposal of all covered products collected by the producer responsibility organization; and(iv) Results of the producer responsibility organization's assessment of the efficacy of the collection, sorting, and transportation process;(p) A description of how the producer responsibility organization provided incentive payments, grants, and market development investments to support the infrastructure necessary to effectively implement the plan, including how incentive payments, grants, and market development investments prioritized infrastructure closer to the point of generation;(q) A description of the outreach and education program including, but not limited to, the producer responsibility organization's evaluation of the efficacy of the comprehensive statewide education and outreach program in section 11 of this act and steps taken to improve the program;(r) A description of how the producer responsibility organization coordinated with other producer responsibility organizations registered under this chapter;(s) A report on activities the producer responsibility organization has undertaken to prioritize the use of sorting, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling facilities located closer to the point of generation to minimize transportation emissions and increase accountability for the ultimate disposition of collected covered products;(t) An analysis of whether the producer responsibility organization met performance standards established by the producer responsibility organization or by the department under section 8 of this act;(u) A description of how the producer responsibility organization addressed the presence of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances and other chemicals identified or regulated under chapters 70A.350 and 70A.430 RCW, including but not limited to the actions taken and investments made to avoid contamination in the repurposing, upcycling, or recycling process, and the availability of end markets for recycled material that could not be remanufactured into apparel or textile articles in Washington;(v) Any other information deemed relevant by the producer responsibility organization for the department to determine compliance with the approved plan; and(w) Other information required by rules adopted by the department.(3)(a) No later than 120 days after the date the department receives the annual report submitted by a producer responsibility organization under subsection (2) of this section, the department must notify the producer responsibility organization if the annual report is compliant or noncompliant.(b) If the department determines that the annual report is noncompliant due to failure to meet the requirements of this chapter, the department may require the resubmittal of the annual report or take enforcement action.(4) Individual producer financial or sales data reported to the department is not a public record consistent with RCW 42.56.270, and is not subject to inspection or copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. APPAREL PRODUCER DISCLOSURE.(1) Beginning January 31, 2027, each producer of apparel must annually disclose the following to the department:(a) A notice consistent with RCW 70A.430.060 identifying each covered product that contains a high priority chemical identified under RCW 70A.430.040 or a priority chemical as defined in RCW 70A.350.010 or that is the subject of a rule adopted under chapter 70A.350 RCW;(b) A description of any terms used in marketing, labels, or public-facing communications by the producer to describe elements of the environmental impact or sustainability of the producer's covered products including, but not limited to, terms such as "sustainable," "green," "low impact," or "environmentally friendly," and how the producer defines or measures such terms;(c) A description of how each producer sells, gifts, or otherwise disposes of unwanted excess covered products that are not sold or rented to consumers through retail, and the volume of such unwanted excess covered products disposed of during the most recent calendar year; and(d) A description of the producer's current activities, initiatives, or targets related to reducing the apparel producer's environmental impacts.(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, beginning January 31, 2027, each apparel producer that has an annual worldwide gross income of the business that exceeds $100,000,000 must disclose the following to the department:(a) The environmental due diligence policies, processes, and outcomes of the apparel producer, including:(i) Significant real or potential adverse environmental impacts associated with the apparel producer;(ii) The contents of any environmental sustainability reports related to the apparel producer's operations;(iii) Measurements of the amount and type of recycled content in each covered product produced by the manufacturer; and(iv) Measurements of the greenhouse gas emissions associated with the apparel producer's covered products, including the methodology associated with such measurements; and(b) The working conditions of the apparel producer and direct suppliers of products for or inputs to the apparel producer.(3)(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:(i) "Due diligence" means the process companies carry out to identify, prevent, mitigate, and account for how they address actual and potential adverse impacts in their own operations, their supply chain, and other business relationships, in the manner recommended in the organization for economic cooperation and development guidelines for multinational enterprises, the organization for economic cooperation and development due diligence guidance for responsible business conduct, and United Nations guiding principles of business and human rights, as those guidelines and guidance existed as of January 1, 2024.(ii) "Gross income of the business" means the value proceeding or accruing by reason of the transaction of the business engaged in and includes gross proceeds of sales, compensation for the rendition of services, gains realized from trading in stocks, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, interest, discount, rents, royalties, fees, commissions, dividends, and other emoluments however designated, all without any deduction on account of the cost of tangible property sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on account of losses.(iii) "Working conditions" means the:(A) Average number of employees by employment type: Full time, part time, and temporary;(B) Average hourly wage, including all nondiscretionary wages and bonuses, by hourly wage bands: $15 or below, $15.01 to $20, $20.01 to $25, $25.01 to $30, $30.01 to $50, and $50.01 or greater;(C) Average total number of employees enrolled in medical plans provided by the employer;(D) Average total number of employees enrolled in dental plans provided by the employer;(E) Average total number of employees enrolled in retirement plans provided by the employer; and(F) Total case incident rate for the prior calendar year.(b) For the purpose of this subsection, "average" means the mean value:(i) For the two previous years; or(ii) If the business has been operational for less than two years, since the business has been operational.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY ADMINISTRATION AND OVERSIGHT.(1)(a) The department must implement, administer, and enforce this chapter. By December 31, 2029, the department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter.(b) To the extent feasible, registration, recordkeeping, reporting, and other logistical requirements adopted by the department under this chapter must be harmonized with similar requirements applicable to producers in other jurisdictions.(c) The rules adopted by the department must establish program requirements that have the effect of encouraging and incentivizing repair, reuse, upcycling, or recycling that minimizes waste, hazardous waste, greenhouse gases, environmental impacts, negative environmental justice impacts, and negative public health impacts.(2)(a) By May 1, 2027, the department must determine an initial annual payment that is adequate to cover the department's costs to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter from the effective date of this section until June 30, 2028. By May 1, 2028, and annually every May 1st thereafter, the department must determine a producer responsibility organization payment due in June to cover the department's estimated cost for the coming fiscal year.(b) The producer responsibility organization must annually pay the department fees to cover the department's incurred costs. The fees must not exceed the department's actual regulatory costs to implement and enforce this chapter.(c) The department must deposit all moneys received from a producer responsibility organization under this subsection in the textile extended producer responsibility account created in section 24 of this act.(3) The department may audit the producer responsibility organization or an individual producer annually with respect to the requirements of this chapter.(4)(a) Within 12 months of the effective date of the rules adopted under this chapter, and on or before July 1st of each year thereafter, the department must post on its internet website a list of producers that are in compliance with this chapter. The department must list, as appropriate, the reported brands of covered products for each producer.(b) A producer that is not listed on the department's internet website under (a) of this subsection that demonstrates compliance with this chapter before the next list is posted by the department may either be added to the internet website or provided a certification letter from the department stating that the producer of a covered product is in compliance with this chapter. The department's list of compliant entities must be available on the department's website in a machine-readable format.(c) If the department determines that a producer is not in compliance with this chapter, the department must remove the producer, along with its brands and covered products, from the list of compliant producers posted on the department's website. The department must list on its internet website a producer, along with its brands and covered products, if the department subsequently determines that the producer is in compliance with this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. ENFORCEMENT.(1)(a) The department may administratively impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 per violation per day on any person who violates this chapter and up to $10,000 per violation per day for the second and each subsequent violation.(b) For a person out of compliance with the requirements of this chapter, the department shall provide written notification and offer information. For the purposes of this section, written notification serves as notice of the violation. The department must issue at least one notice of violation by certified mail prior to assessing a penalty and the department may only impose a penalty on a person that has not met the requirements of this chapter 60 days following the date the written notification of the violation was sent.(2)(a) The department may administratively impose a civil penalty of up to $10,000 per violation per day on any producer responsibility organization that violates this chapter and up to $50,000 per violation per day for the second and each subsequent violation.(b) The department may, in addition to assessing the penalties provided in (a) of this subsection, take any combination of the following actions:(i) Issue a corrective action order to a producer responsibility organization;(ii) Issue an order to a producer responsibility organization to provide for the continued implementation of the program in the absence of an approved plan;(iii) Revoke the producer responsibility organization's plan approval and require implementation of the contingency plan; or(iv) Require a producer responsibility organization to revise or resubmit a plan within a specified time frame.(c) Prior to taking an action described in this subsection, the department must provide the producer responsibility organization an opportunity to respond to or rebut the written finding upon which the action is predicated.(3)(a) The department may require a producer, producer responsibility organization, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, or importer to:(i) Provide the department with reasonable and timely access, as determined by the department, to its facilities and operations, as necessary to determine compliance with this chapter; or(ii) Report additional information to allow the department to determine compliance with this chapter.(b) Records required by this chapter must be maintained and accessible for five years. All reports and records provided to the department under this chapter must be provided under penalty of perjury.(4) A person may not introduce a covered product of a producer that is not participating in a producer responsibility organization or that is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.(a) The department shall serve, or send with delivery confirmation, a written warning explaining the violation to a person introducing covered products of a producer that is not in compliance with this chapter.(b) The department may assess a penalty on a person that continues to introduce covered products of a producer that is in violation of this chapter 60 days after receipt of the written warning under this subsection. The amount of the penalty that the department may assess under this subsection is twice the value of the covered products sold in violation of this chapter or $500, whichever is greater. The department must waive the penalty upon verification that the person has discontinued distribution or sales of the covered product within 30 days of the date the penalty is assessed.(5) Any person who incurs a penalty or receives an order may appeal the penalty or order to the pollution control hearings board created in chapter 43.21B RCW.(6) Penalties levied under this section must be deposited in the model toxics control operating account created in RCW 70A.305.180.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. MARKETPLACE PROVISIONS.(1) Retailers, importers, distributors, and online marketplaces for covered products must monitor the department's internet website where compliant producers are posted under section 14(4) of this act, to determine if a producer, brand, or covered product is in compliance with this chapter for that producer of covered products.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, on and after the date a plan is approved by the department, a retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace is prohibited from introducing a covered product for use in the state unless the producer of the covered product is listed as in compliance for that brand and covered product.(b) A retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace may introduce a covered product:(i) If the retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace has fulfilled the obligations for those covered products which the retailer, importer, distributor, or online marketplace introduces;(ii) If, on the date the retailer or distributor introduces the covered product in or into the state, the producer, brand, or covered product was listed as compliant on the department's internet website; and(iii) Any existing stock of a retailer or distributor before the initial list was posted by the department on the department's internet website.(c) This subsection does not apply to secondhand covered products.(3) An online marketplace must annually do the following consistent with rules adopted by the department:(a) Notify the department and the producer responsibility organization of all third-party sellers with sales of covered products over $1,000,000 sold on their online marketplace in the preceding year and provide all required information. The amount of the sales described in this subsection includes only those transactions through the online marketplace for which payment is processed by the online marketplace directly or through its payment processor;(b) Provide all third-party sellers described in (a) of this subsection with the information requirements of law as provided by the producer responsibility organization consistent with the requirements of section 11 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. PROHIBITION ON CERTAIN USES OF PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION FUNDS.A producer responsibility organization may not use funds collected to implement a plan required under this chapter for purposes associated with:(1) The payment of an administrative penalty levied;(2) Administrative appeals of orders or penalties;(3) Litigation between the producer responsibility organization and the state;(4) Compensation of a person whose position is primarily representing the producer responsibility organization relative to the passage, defeat, approval, or modification of legislation that is being considered by a government entity;(5) Paid advertisements related to encouraging the passage, defeat, approval, or modification of legislation that is being considered during an upcoming or current legislative session or was considered during the previous legislative session; or(6) For any other lobbying or political advocacy activities that would require reporting under chapterÂ  42.17AÂ RCW or under the federal election campaign act, 2 U.S.C. chapter 14.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. ADVISORY COUNCIL.(1) The textiles and apparel producer responsibility advisory council is established to review all activities conducted by producer responsibility organizations under this chapter and to advise the department and producer responsibility organizations regarding the implementation of this chapter.(2) By January 31, 2027, the department must establish and appoint the initial membership of the advisory council. The membership of the advisory council must consist of the following:(a) One member representing manufacturers of textiles or a statewide or national trade association representing those manufacturers;(b) One member representing manufacturers of apparel or a statewide or national trade association representing those manufacturers;(c) Two members representing recycling facilities that manage textiles and apparel;(d) One member representing a solid waste collection company or a statewide association representing solid waste collection companies;(e) One member representing retailers of textiles and apparel or a statewide trade association representing those retailers;(f) One member representing a statewide nonprofit environmental organization with a focus on textile reuse, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling;(g) One member representing a community-based nonprofit environmental justice organization with a focus on textile reuse, repurposing, upcycling, and recycling;(h) One member representing entities that own or operate clothing drop-off collection locations in Washington;(i) One member representing nonprofit thrift stores;(j) One member representing a covered product consignment business;(k) Two members representing individuals or organizations representing overburdened, underrepresented, or historically marginalized communities;(l) One member representing an association of counties;(m) One member representing an association of cities;(n) One member representing tribal or indigenous textile or apparel management organizations;(o) One nonvoting member representing each registered producer responsibility organization; and(p) One nonvoting member representing the department.(3) In appointing members, the department:(a) Is prohibited from appointing members who are state legislators or registered lobbyists;(b) Is prohibited from appointing members who are employees of producers required to be members of a producer responsibility organization under this chapter; and(c) Must endeavor to appoint members from all regions of the state.(4)(a) The member appointed to represent the department serves at the pleasure of the department. All other members serve for a term of four years, except that the initial term for nine of the initial appointees must be two years so that membership terms are staggered. Members may be reappointed but may not serve more than eight consecutive years.(b) A member may be removed by the department at any time. The chair of the advisory council must inform the department of a member missing three consecutive meetings. After the second consecutive missed meeting, the chair of the advisory council must notify the member in writing that the member may be removed for missing the next meeting. If there is a vacancy on the advisory council for any reason, the department shall make an appointment to become effective immediately for the unexpired term.(5) Advisory councilmembers that are representatives of tribes, tribal or indigenous services organizations, community-based organizations, or environmental nonprofit organizations must, if requested, be compensated and reimbursed in accordance with RCWÂ  43.03.050,Â  43.03.060, andÂ  43.03.220.(6)(a) A majority of the voting members of the advisory council constitutes a quorum. If there is a vacancy in the membership of the advisory council, a majority of the remaining voting members of the advisory council constitutes a quorum.(b) Action by the advisory council requires a quorum and a majority of those present and voting. All members of the advisory council, except the member appointed to represent the department and the member appointed to represent the producer responsibility organization, are voting members of the advisory council.(7)(a) The advisory council must meet at least two times per year and may meet more frequently upon 10 days' written notice at the request of the chair or a majority of its members.(b) Meetings of the advisory council must comply with chapterÂ  42.30Â RCW, the open public meetings act.(8) At its initial meeting, and every two years thereafter, the advisory council must elect a chair and vice chair from among its members.(9) The department shall provide administrative and operating support to the advisory council, including compensation in accordance with subsection (5) of this section, and may contract with a third-party facilitator to assist in administering the activities of the advisory council, including establishing a website or landing page on the department website.(10) The department must assist the advisory council in developing policies and procedures governing the disclosure of actual or perceived conflicts of interest that advisory councilmembers may have as a result of their employment or financial holdings with respect to themselves or family members. Each advisory councilmember is responsible for reviewing the conflict-of-interest policies and procedures. An advisory councilmember must disclose any instance of actual or perceived conflicts of interest at each meeting of the advisory council at which recommendations regarding plans, programs, operations, or activities are made by the advisory council.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 19. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION SUBMISSION.A producer responsibility organization, producer, or other entity that submits information or records to the department under this chapter may request that the information or records, including data related to business profits, service rates, fees, or business expenses or private data on individuals, be made available only for the confidential use of the department, the director of the department, the appropriate division of the department, or the independent consultant carrying out the independent review of the program in RCW 70A.208.210. The director of the department must consider the request and if this action is not detrimental to the public interest and is otherwise in accordance with the policies and purposes of chapter 43.21A RCW, the director must grant the request for the information to remain confidential as authorized in RCW 43.21A.160.Sec. 20. RCW 36.70.330 and 2022 c 180 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:SITING OF PROGRAM INFRASTRUCTURE.The comprehensive plan shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives, principles and standards used to develop it, and shall include each of the following elements:(1) A land use element which designates the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land for agriculture, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, education, public buildings and lands, and other categories of public and private use of land, including a statement of the standards of population density and building intensity recommended for the various areas in the jurisdiction and estimates of future population growth in the area covered by the comprehensive plan, all correlated with the land use element of the comprehensive plan. The land use element shall also provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies and shall review drainage, flooding, and stormwater runoff in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound. Development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under this chapter that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2025, must allow for the siting of organic materials management facilities in the areas identified in RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(i) to the extent necessary to provide for the establishment of the organic materials management volumetric capacity identified under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(ii). Development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under this chapter that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2027, must allow for the siting of collection sites under chapter 70A.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 28 of this act) to the extent necessary to ensure the satisfaction of the collection standards in section 9(2) of this act and the achievement of the performance targets in section 8 of this act;(2) A circulation element consisting of the general location, alignment and extent of major thoroughfares, major transportation routes, trunk utility lines, and major terminal facilities, all of which shall be correlated with the land use element of the comprehensive plan;(3) Any supporting maps, diagrams, charts, descriptive material and reports necessary to explain and supplement the above elements.Sec. 21. RCW 36.70A.142 and 2022 c 180 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:SITING OF PROGRAM INFRASTRUCTURE.(1) Development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under this chapter that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2025, must allow for the siting of organic materials management facilities in the areas identified in RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(i) to the extent necessary to provide for the establishment of the organic materials management volumetric capacity identified under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(ii).(2) Development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under this chapter that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2027, must allow for the siting of collection sites under chapter 70A.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 28 of this act) to the extent necessary to ensure the satisfaction of the collection standards in section 9(2) of this act and the achievement of the performance targets in section 8 of this act.Sec. 22. RCW 35.63.290 and 2022 c 180 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:SITING OF PROGRAM INFRASTRUCTURE.(1) For cities not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under RCW 35.63.100 that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2025, must allow for the siting of organic materials management facilities in the areas identified by the county in which the city is located under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(i) to the extent necessary to provide for the establishment of the organic materials management volumetric capacity identified under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(ii).(2) For cities not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under this chapter that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2027, must allow for the siting of collection sites under chapter 70A.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 28 of this act) to the extent necessary to ensure the satisfaction of the collection standards in section 9(2) of this act and the achievement of the performance targets in section 8 of this act.Sec. 23. RCW 35A.63.310 and 2022 c 180 s 604 are each amended to read as follows:SITING OF PROGRAM INFRASTRUCTURE.(1) For cities not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, development regulations to implement comprehensive plans required under RCW 35A.63.060 that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2025, must allow for the siting of organic materials management facilities in the areas identified by the county in which the city is located under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(i) to the extent necessary to provide for the establishment of the organic materials management volumetric capacity identified under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(ii).(2) For cities not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under this chapter that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2027, must allow for the siting of collection sites under chapter 70A.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 28 of this act) to the extent necessary to ensure the satisfaction of the collection standards in section 9(2) of this act and the achievement of the performance targets in section 8 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 24. ACCOUNT.(1) The textile extended producer responsibility account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts received by the department under this chapter must be deposited in the account. Only the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account may be used by the department only for implementing, administering, and enforcing the requirements of this chapter.(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the portion of the producer responsibility organization fee received in 2027 for the costs of the department be transferred to whichever state account was used to cover the costs of the department prior to the payment of the producer responsibility organization fee in 2027.Sec. 25. RCW 43.21B.110 and 2025 c 327 s 1, 2025 c 319 s 6, 2025 c 316 s 301, 2025 c 314 s 13, 2025 c 311 s 7, and 2025 c 58 s 1008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:POLLUTION CONTROL HEARINGS BOARD JURISDICTION.(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70A.15 RCW, local health departments, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the parks and recreation commission, and authorized public entities described in chapter 79.100 RCW:(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to chapter 70A.230 RCW and RCW 18.104.155, 70A.15.3160, 70A.300.090, 70A.20.050, 70A.205.740, 70A.205.280, 70A.205.545, 70A.355.070, 70A.430.070, 70A.500.260, 70A.505.100, 70A.505.110, 70A.530.040, 70A.350.070, 70A.515.060, 70A.245.040, 70A.245.050, 70A.245.070, 70A.245.080, 70A.245.130, 70A.245.140, 70A.65.200, 70A.455.090, 70A.535.180, 70A.550.030, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, 70A.565.030, section 15 of this act, 76.04.205, 76.09.170, 77.55.440, 78.44.250, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060, 18.104.130, 43.27A.190, 70A.15.2520, 70A.15.3010, 70A.15.4530, 70A.15.6010, 70A.205.740, 70A.205.280, 70A.214.140, 70A.300.120, 70A.350.070, 70A.245.020, 70A.65.200, 70A.535.180, 70A.505.100, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, 70A.565.030, section 15 of this act, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.03.665, 90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, 90.48.240, 90.56.330, and 90.64.040.(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance, modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by the department or any air authority in the exercise of its jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit, a decision to approve or deny a solid waste management plan under RCW 70A.205.055, approval or denial of an application for a beneficial use determination under RCW 70A.205.260, an application for a change under RCW 90.03.383, or a permit to distribute reclaimed water under RCW 90.46.220.(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the granting or denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70A.205 RCW, including appeals by the department as provided in RCW 70A.205.130.(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW 70A.226.090.(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820.(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026 as provided in RCW 90.64.028.(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources' appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of public lands under RCW 76.06.180.(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue, deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under chapter 77.55 RCW, to issue a stop work order, to issue a notice to comply, to issue a civil penalty, or to issue a notice of intent to disapprove applications.(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.(m) Decisions of an authorized public entity under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are reviewable by the hearings board under RCW 79.100.120.(n) Decisions of the department of ecology that are appealable under RCW 70A.245.020 to set recycled minimum postconsumer content for products or to temporarily exclude types of products in plastic containers from minimum postconsumer recycled content requirements.(o) Orders by the department of ecology under RCW 70A.455.080.(p) Decisions by the department of ecology under RCW 70A.208.150(5) regarding a proposal by a producer responsibility organization to count materials sent to an alternative recycling facility towards recycling performance targets.(q) Decisions of the department of natural resources under RCW 76.04.205.(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings board:(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW, except where appeals to the pollution control hearings board and appeals to the shorelines hearings board have been consolidated pursuant to RCW 43.21B.340.(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.15.3010, 70A.15.3070, 70A.15.3080, 70A.15.3090, 70A.15.3100, 70A.15.3110, and 90.44.180.(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and 90.44.220.(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or repeal rules.(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.Sec. 26. RCW 43.21B.300 and 2025 c 316 s 302 and 2025 c 58 s 3008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:POLLUTION CONTROL HEARINGS BOARD PROCESSES.(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70A.15.3160, 70A.205.280, 70A.230.080, 70A.300.090, 70A.20.050, 70A.245.040, 70A.245.050, 70A.245.070, 70A.245.080, 70A.245.130, 70A.245.140, 70A.65.200, 70A.430.070, 70A.455.090, 70A.500.260, 70A.505.110, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, 70A.565.030, section 15 of this act, 86.16.081, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102 and chapter 70A.355 RCW shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the penalty from the department or the local air authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity. For penalties issued by local air authorities, within 30 days after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the authority for the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever terms the authority in its discretion deems proper. The authority may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or authority 30 days after the date of receipt by the person penalized of the notice imposing the penalty or 30 days after the date of receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority of the application for relief from penalty.(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:(a) 30 days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;(b) 30 days after receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority on application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or(c) 30 days after receipt of the notice of decision of the hearings board if the penalty is appealed.(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department within 30 days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the authority within 30 days after it becomes due and payable, the authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund except the following:(a) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155 must be credited to the reclamation account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7);(b) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.15.3160 must be disposed of pursuant to RCW 70A.15.3160;(c) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.230.080, 70A.300.090, 70A.430.070, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, and 70A.565.030 must be credited to the model toxics control operating account created in RCW 70A.305.180;(d) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.245.040, 70A.245.050, and chapter 70A.208 RCW must be credited to the recycling enhancement account created in RCW 70A.245.100;(e) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.500.260 must be deposited into the electronic products recycling account created in RCW 70A.500.130;(f) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.65.200 must be credited to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250;(g) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 90.56.330 must be credited to the coastal protection fund established in RCW 90.48.390; and(h) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.355.070 must be credited to the underground storage tank account created in RCW 70A.355.090.Sec. 27. RCW 70A.208.270 and 2025 c 316 s 127 are each amended to read as follows:RECYCLING REFORM ACT AMENDMENT.(1) The department must periodically assess the availability of, and methodology used by, the United States centers for disease control and the agency for toxic substances and disease registry's social vulnerability index, as compared to how it existed as of January 1, 2025.(2) If the department determines that the social vulnerability index is no longer available in substantially the same form as it existed on January 1, 2025, the department must notify each registered producer responsibility organization under this chapter and chapter 70A.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 28 of this act) that for purposes of the identification of socially vulnerable populations under this chapter and chapter 70A.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 28 of this act), the department and producer responsibility organizations are no longer required to reference the United States centers for disease control and the agency for toxic substances and disease registry's social vulnerability index. Instead, the department and registered producer responsibility organizations must reference the alternative populations specified in subsection (3) of this section.(3)(a) Until such time as a rule is adopted under (b) of this subsection, the department and registered producer responsibility organizations must, for purposes of identifying socially vulnerable populations, identify as socially vulnerable populations those communities ranked as an eight or higher on the environmental health disparities map developed under RCW 43.70.815.(b) After making a determination under subsection (2) of this section, by rule the department may, but is not required to, adopt an alternative methodology for the identification of socially vulnerable populations to replace the reference to the United States centers for disease control and the agency for toxic substances and disease registry's social vulnerability index. A rule adopted under this subsection may, but is not required to, rely in whole or in part on the environmental health disparities map developed by the department of health under RCW 43.70.815.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 28. Sections 1 through 19 and 24 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70A RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 29. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---